Massachusetts, session 194th, S906.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 176O of the General Laws is amended by adding the following
Section.
Section 28. (a) When establishing alternative payment arrangements, a carrier may take
into account patient population characteristics including age, acuity, social determinants of
health, and behavioral health service needs. The measures of total medical expense used to
establish an alternative payment arrangement should include expenses incurred by all providers
in the carrier’s provider network, uniformly applied by provider type. When establishing
alternative payment arrangements, a carrier shall not take into account provider prices or historic
medical spending attributable only to a subset of its provider network or the historic medical
expenses of members based on their attribution to specific providers in the carrier’s network.
of 2

(b) In addition to the factors set forth in subsection (a) of this section, an alternative
payment arrangement may include adjustments for claims processing and administrative costs
and incentive payments based on attainment of quality measures or outcomes, as negotiated
between a carrier and providers participating in the alternative payment arrangement.
(c) Each carrier shall file with the center for health information and analysis data on its
alternative payment arrangements sufficient for the verification of compliance with subsection
(a) of this section, in a form determined by the center for health information and analysis.
(d) A violation of subsection (a) or (c) of this section shall be a violation of chapter 93A
of the general laws.
SECTION 2. Chapter 176O is amended by adding the following definition after the
definition of adverse determination:
“Alternative payment arrangement” means a contract between a carrier and a health care
provider or group of providers under which payment is made by capitation, shared savings,
reconciliation of fee-for-service payments against a global budget or per-member-per month
target, or any other method that bases payments to the provider on a projection of the medical
expenses to be incurred by a population of individuals.
of 2